apertium-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="ank/er__n">
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ere</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eret</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>era</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ra</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vier__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ruter__n" c="¹ er spelkortet, utan superskript er nettverksdingsen">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>¹<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>¹<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>¹<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>¹<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="m/oder__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ødrene</l>    <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ødrer</l>     <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødre</l>      <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oderen</l>    <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oder</l>      <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="søp/pel__n">
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>la</l>        <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pel</l>       <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pelen</l>     <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pel</l>       <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ler</l>       <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pel</l>       <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>pelet</l>     <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pel</l>       <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>la</l>        <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kup/pel__n">
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pelen</l>     <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pel</l>       <r>pel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lem__n">
  <e>       <p><l>mene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ma</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="anker">           <i>ank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="ruter">           <i>ruter</i><par n="ruter__n"/></e>
<e lm="alsikekløver"><i>alsikekløver</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="balsampoppel"><i>balsampop</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="bauganker"><i>baugank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="disippel"><i>disip</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="drivanker"><i>drivank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="hvitkløver"><i>hvitkløver</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="klinker"><i>klinker</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="kuppel"><i>kup</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="kvitkløver"><i>kvitkløver</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="laukkuppel"><i>laukkup</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="løkkuppel"><i>løkkup</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="nippel"><i>nip</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="nødanker"><i>nødank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="poppel"><i>pop</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="raudkløver"><i>raudkløver</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="skruppel"><i>skrup</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="søtvier"><i>søtvier</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="varpanker"><i>varpank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="vier"><i>vier</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="vinanker"><i>vinank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="ørevier"><i>ørevier</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="brennevinsanker"><i>brennevinsank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="formoder"><i>form</i><par n="m/oder__n"/></e>
<e lm="husholdningssøppel"><i>husholdningssøp</i><par n="søp/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="industrisøppel">  <i>industrisøp</i><par n="søp/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="kirkekuppel">     <i>kirkekup</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="lampekuppel">     <i>lampekup</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="lem">             <i>lem</i><par n="lem__n"/></e>
<e lm="luftenippel">     <i>luftenip</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="moder">           <i>m</i><par n="m/oder__n"/></e>
<e lm="rødkløver">       <i>rødkløver</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="sjukehussøppel">  <i>sjukehussøp</i><par n="søp/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="skylddaler">      <i>skylddaler</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="smørenippel">     <i>smørenip</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="stålkuppel">      <i>stålkup</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="sykehussøppel">   <i>sykehussøp</i><par n="søp/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="søppel">          <i>søp</i><par n="søp/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="ansatsnippel">          <i>ansatsnip</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="nyhetsanker">	<i>nyhetsank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="sportsanker">	<i>sportsank</i><par n="ank/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="glasskuppel">                    <i>glasskup</i><par n="kup/pel__n"/></e>
<e lm="istervier">                      <i>istervier</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="harekløver">                     <i>harekløver</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
<e lm="bukkehornkløver">                <i>bukkehornkløver</i><par n="vier__n"/></e>
